Missouri, session 2026, HB3223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.511, to read as follows:
9.511. The month of February is hereby designated as "Miscarriage Awareness
2 Month" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in
3 appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about miscarriage that effects one in
4 four pregnancies.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.